Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
OREGON CLEAN DIESEL PROGRAM
(Definitions)
SECTION 1.  ORS 468A.795 is amended to read:
468A.795. As used in ORS 468A.795 to 468A.803 and sections  11 to 16, chapter 855, Oregon Laws
2007:
[(1) “Combined weight” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005. ]
(1) “Alternative fuel” means biofuels, biogas, natural gas, liquefied petroleum  gas, hy-
drogen and electricity.
(2) “Best available exhaust control technology” means the most effective exhaust  con-
trols to reduce diesel particulate that rely on passively regenerated  diesel particulate control
technology supported in a vehicle’s normal duty cycle.
(3) “Combined weight” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
[(2)] (4)  “Cost-effectiveness threshold” means the cost, in dollars, per ton of diesel particulate
matter reduced, as established by rule of the Environmental Quality Commission.
(5) “Diesel engine” means a compression ignition engine.
(6) “Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement” means the Environmental  Mitigation
Trust Agreement required by the Volkswagen “Clean  Diesel” Marketing, Sales Practices and
Products Liability Litigation partial consent decree dated October 25, 2016.
(7) “Equivalent equipment” means a  piece of equipment that performs the same function
and has the equivalent horsepower to a piece of equipment subject to a replacement.
(8) “Equivalent motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle  that performs the same function
and is in the same weight class as a motor vehicle subject to a replacement.
[(3)] (9) “Heavy-duty truck” means a  motor vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a unit
that has a combined weight that is greater than 26,000 pounds.
[(4)] (10) “Incremental cost” means the cost of a qualifying  repower or retrofit less a baseline
cost that would otherwise be incurred in the normal course of business.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1008 (SB 1008-B) Page 1
[(5)] (11) “Medium-duty truck” means a motor  vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a
unit that has a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds but  less than or equal to 26,000
pounds.
[(6)] (12) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
[(7) “Nonroad Oregon diesel engine” means any Oregon diesel engine that  was not designed pri-
marily to propel a motor vehicle on public highways of this state. ]
(13) “Nonroad diesel engine” means a diesel engine of 25 horsepower or more that is not
designed primarily to propel a motor vehicle on public highways.
[(8)] (14)  “Oregon diesel engine” means an engine at least 50 percent of the  use of which, as
measured by miles driven or hours operated, will occur in Oregon for the three years  following the
repowering or retrofitting of the engine.
[(9)] (15)  “Oregon diesel truck engine” means a diesel engine in a truck at least 50 percent of
the use of which, as  measured by miles driven or hours operated, has occurred in Oregon for the
two years preceding the scrapping of the engine.
[(10)] (16) “Public highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(17)(a) “Replacement” means:
(A) To scrap a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine and replace the motor  vehicle
with an equivalent motor vehicle; or
(B) To scrap a piece of equipment  powered by a nonroad diesel engine and replace the
equipment with equivalent equipment.
(b) “Replacement” does not mean ordinary maintenance,  repair or replacement of a die-
sel engine.
[(11)] (18) “Repower” means to scrap an old diesel engine and [ replace] substitute  it with a new
engine, a used engine or a  remanufactured engine, or with electric motors, drives or fuel cells, with
a minimum useful life of seven years.
[(12)] (19) “Retrofit” means to equip a diesel engine with new emissions-reducing  parts or tech-
nology after the manufacture of the original engine. A retrofit must  use the greatest degree of
emissions reduction available for  the particular application of the equipment retrofitted that meets
the cost-effectiveness threshold.
[(13)] (20) “Scrap” means to destroy , [ and] render inoperable  and recycle .
[(14)] (21) “Truck” means a motor vehicle or combination of  vehicles operated as a unit that has
a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 468A.795, as amended by section 6a, chapter 855,  Oregon Laws 2007, is
amended to read:
468A.795. As used in ORS 468A.795 to 468A.803:
[(1) “Combined weight” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005. ]
(1) “Alternative fuel”  means biofuels, biogas, natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas, hy-
drogen and electricity.
(2) “Best  available exhaust control technology” means the most effective exhaust con-
trols to reduce diesel particulate that rely on passively regenerated  diesel particulate control
technology supported in a vehicle’s normal duty cycle.
(3) “Combined weight” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
[(2)] (4)  “Cost-effectiveness threshold” means the cost, in dollars, per ton of diesel  particulate
matter reduced, as established by rule of the Environmental Quality Commission.
(5) “Diesel engine” means a compression ignition engine.
(6) “Environmental  Mitigation Trust Agreement” means the Environmental Mitigation
Trust Agreement required by the Volkswagen “Clean  Diesel” Marketing, Sales Practices and
Products Liability Litigation partial consent decree dated October 25, 2016.
(7) “Equivalent equipment” means a  piece of equipment that performs the same function
and has the equivalent horsepower to a piece of equipment subject to a replacement.
(8) “Equivalent motor vehicle” means a  motor vehicle that performs the same function
and is in the same weight class as a motor vehicle subject to a replacement.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1008 (SB 1008-B) Page 2
[(3)] (9) “Heavy-duty truck” means a  motor vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a unit
that has a combined weight that is greater than 26,000 pounds.
[(4)] (10)  “Incremental cost” means the cost  of a qualifying repower or retrofit less a baseline
cost that would otherwise be incurred in the normal course of business.
[(5)] (11) “Medium-duty truck” means a motor vehicle or  combination of vehicles operated as a
unit that has a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds but  less than or equal to 26,000
pounds.
[(6)] (12) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
[(7) “Nonroad Oregon diesel engine” means any Oregon diesel engine that  was not designed pri-
marily to propel a motor vehicle on public highways of this state. ]
(13) “Nonroad diesel engine” means a diesel engine of 25 horsepower or more that is not
designed primarily to propel a motor vehicle on public highways.
[(8)] (14)  “Oregon diesel engine” means an engine at least 50 percent of the  use of which, as
measured by miles driven or hours operated, will occur in Oregon for the three years  following the
repowering or retrofitting of the engine.
[(9)] (15)  “Oregon diesel truck engine” means a diesel engine in a truck at least 50 percent of
the use of which, as  measured by miles driven or hours operated, has occurred in Oregon for the
two years preceding the scrapping of the engine.
[(10)] (16) “Public highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(17)(a) “Replacement” means:
(A) To scrap a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine and replace the motor  vehicle
with an equivalent motor vehicle; or
(B) To scrap a piece of equipment  powered by a nonroad diesel engine and replace the
equipment with equivalent equipment.
(b) “Replacement” does not mean ordinary maintenance,  repair or replacement of a die-
sel engine.
[(11)] (18) “Repower” means to scrap an old diesel engine and [ replace] substitute  it with a new
engine, a used engine or a  remanufactured engine, or with electric motors, drives or fuel cells, with
a minimum useful life of seven years.
[(12)] (19) “Retrofit” means to equip a diesel engine with new emissions-reducing  parts or tech-
nology after the manufacture of the original engine. A retrofit must  use the greatest degree of
emissions reduction available for  the particular application of the equipment retrofitted that meets
the cost-effectiveness threshold.
[(13)] (20) “Scrap” means to destroy , [ and] render inoperable  and recycle .
[(14)] (21) “Truck” means a motor vehicle or combination of  vehicles operated as a unit that has
a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds.
(Clean Diesel Engine Fund; Uses)
SECTION 3.
 ORS 468A.797 is amended to read:
468A.797. (1) The  Environmental Quality Commission by rule shall establish standards related
to the certified cost  necessary to perform a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit, including
but not limited to rules establishing the certified cost for purposes of the tax credit established in
section 12, chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007.
(2) For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, certified cost:
(a) May not exceed the incremental cost of labor and hardware that the Department  of Envi-
ronmental Quality finds necessary to perform a qualifying repower or retrofit;
(b) Does not include the cost of any portion of  a  replacement,  repower or retrofit undertaken
to comply with any applicable local, state or federal pollution or  emissions law or for ordinary
maintenance, repair or replacement of a diesel engine; and
(c) May not exceed the cost-effectiveness threshold.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1008 (SB 1008-B) Page 3
SECTION 4.  ORS 468A.797, as amended by section 7a, chapter 855,  Oregon Laws 2007, is
amended to read:
468A.797. (1) The  Environmental Quality Commission by rule shall establish standards related
to the certified cost necessary to perform a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit.
(2) For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, certified cost:
(a) May not exceed the incremental cost of labor and hardware that the Department  of Envi-
ronmental Quality finds necessary to perform a qualifying repower or retrofit;
(b) Does not include the cost of any portion of  a  replacement,  repower or retrofit undertaken
to comply with any applicable local, state or federal pollution or  emissions law or for ordinary
maintenance, repair or replacement of a diesel engine; and
(c) May not exceed the cost-effectiveness threshold.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 468A.799 is amended to read:
468A.799. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission by rule shall  establish standards for [ the
qualifying repower of a nonroad Oregon  diesel engine or retrofit of an Oregon diesel engine, ] quali-
fying replacements, repowers and retrofits,  including but not  limited to rules establishing re-
power or retrofit qualifications for purposes of the tax credit  established in section 12, chapter 855,
Oregon Laws 2007.
(2) The standards adopted by the commission under this section must [ include] require, at a
minimum:
[(a) A requirement for the reduction of diesel particulate matter emissions by at least 25 percent
compared with the baseline emissions for the relevant engine year and application; ]
(a) For the qualifying replacement of a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine, that:
(A) The motor vehicle to be scrapped has at least three years of  remaining useful life;
and
(B) The engine model year of the equivalent motor vehicle is 2010 or newer.
(b) For the qualifying replacement of a  piece of equipment powered by a nonroad diesel
engine, that:
(A) The nonroad piece of equipment to  be scrapped has at least three years of remaining
useful life; and
(B) The equivalent equipment is powered by:
(i) A nonroad diesel engine, whether or not capable of being powered by alternative fuel,
that meets or exceeds United States Environmental Protection Agency Tier 4 exhaust  emis-
sion standards for nonroad compression ignition engines;
(ii) A nonroad engine capable of being powered by alternative fuel that meets or  exceeds
United States Environmental Protection Agency Tier 2  exhaust emission standards for non-
road spark ignition engines; or
(iii) A nonroad engine powered by electricity.
(c) For the qualifying repower of a nonroad  diesel engine, that the repower will be ac-
complished using:
(A) A nonroad diesel engine, whether or not capable of being powered by alternative  fuel,
that is at least one tier higher than the engine to  be scrapped, based on the United States
Environmental Protection Agency tier standards for nonroad compression ignition engines;
(B) A nonroad engine capable of being powered by alternative  fuel that meets or exceeds
United States Environmental Protection Agency Tier  2 exhaust emission standards for non-
road spark ignition engines; or
(C) A nonroad engine powered by electricity.
(d) For the qualifying retrofit of a diesel engine, a resulting reduction of  diesel
particulate matter emissions by at least 85 percent when compared  with the baseline emis-
sions for the relevant engine year and application.
[(b)] (e) That  a list of technologies approved as qualifying repowers or retrofits that  have been
verified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency  or the California Air Resources
Board[; and ] is included in the standards.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1008 (SB 1008-B) Page 4
(3) The commission by rule shall establish standards for the methods of recycling used
for scrapping a motor vehicle, a piece of equipment powered by a nonroad diesel  engine or
a nonroad diesel engine after a qualifying replacement or repower.
[(c)] (4) [ A requirement that ] A qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit [ does] may  not in-
clude the replacement, repower or retrofit  of a motor vehicle , piece of equipment  or engine for
which a grant, loan or tax credit under ORS 468A.803 or  section 12, chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007,
has previously been awarded  or allowed, unless the replacement, repower or retrofit will reduce
emissions further than the replacement, repower or retrofit funded by the previous grant, loan or
tax credit.
SECTION 6.  ORS 468A.799, as  amended by section 8a, chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007, is
amended to read:
468A.799. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission by rule shall  establish standards for [ the
qualifying repower of a nonroad Oregon diesel engine or retrofit of an Oregon  diesel engine ] qualify-
ing replacements, repowers and retrofits .
(2) The standards adopted by the commission under this section must [ include] require, at a
minimum:
[(a) A requirement for the reduction of diesel particulate matter emissions by at least 25 percent
compared with the baseline emissions for the relevant engine year and application; ]
(a) For the qualifying replacement of a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine, that:
(A) The motor vehicle  to be scrapped has at least three years of remaining useful life;
and
(B) The engine model year of the equivalent motor vehicle is 2010 or newer.
(b) For the qualifying replacement of a piece of  equipment powered by a nonroad diesel
engine, that:
(A) The nonroad piece of equipment to  be scrapped has at least three years of remaining
useful life; and
(B) The equivalent equipment is powered by:
(i) A nonroad diesel engine, whether or not capable of being powered by alternative fuel,
that meets  or exceeds United States Environmental Protection Agency Tier 4 exhaust emis-
sion standards for nonroad compression ignition engines;
(ii) A nonroad engine capable of being powered by alternative fuel that meets or  exceeds
United States Environmental Protection Agency Tier  2 exhaust emission standards for non-
road spark ignition engines; or
(iii) A nonroad engine powered by electricity.
(c) For the qualifying repower of a nonroad diesel  engine, that the repower will be ac-
complished using:
(A) A nonroad diesel engine, whether or not capable of being powered by alternative  fuel,
that is at least one tier higher than  the engine to be scrapped, based on the United States
Environmental Protection Agency tier standards for nonroad compression ignition engines;
(B) A nonroad engine capable of being powered by alternative  fuel that meets or exceeds
United States Environmental Protection Agency Tier 2  exhaust emission standards for non-
road spark ignition engines; or
(C) A nonroad engine powered by electricity.
(d) For  the qualifying retrofit of a diesel engine, a resulting reduction of diesel
particulate matter emissions by at  least 85 percent when compared with the baseline emis-
sions for the relevant engine year and application.
[(b)] (e) That a list of technologies approved as qualifying repowers or retrofits that  have been
verified by the United States Environmental  Protection Agency or the California Air Resources
Board[; and ] is included in the standards.
(3) The commission by rule shall establish standards for the methods of recycling used
for scrapping a  motor vehicle, a piece of equipment powered by a nonroad diesel engine or
a nonroad diesel engine after a qualifying replacement or repower.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1008 (SB 1008-B) Page 5
[(c)] (4)  [ A requirement that ] A qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit [ does] may  not in-
clude the replacement, repower or retrofit  of a motor vehicle , piece of equipment  or engine for
which a grant or loan under  ORS 468A.803 has previously been awarded or allowed, unless the
replacement, repower or  retrofit will reduce emissions further than the replacement, repower or
retrofit funded by the previous grant or loan.
SECTION 7.  ORS 468A.801 is amended to read:
468A.801. (1) The Clean Diesel Engine Fund is established in  the State Treasury separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Clean Diesel  Engine Fund shall be credited
to the fund. The moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Environ-
mental Quality to be used for the purposes described in ORS 468A.803.
(2) The Clean Diesel Engine Fund consists of:
(a) Funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Grants provided by the federal government pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act,  42 U.S.C.
7401 et seq., or other federal laws; [ and]
[(c) Any other revenues derived from gifts  or grants given to the state for the purpose of providing
financial assistance to owners or operators of diesel engines for  the purpose of repowering, retrofitting
or scrapping diesel engines to reduce diesel engine emissions. ]
(c) Moneys paid to the State of  Oregon pursuant to the Environmental Mitigation Trust
Agreement;
(d) Any other moneys received by the state for the purpose of  providing financial and
technical assistance to  owners or operators of diesel engines for the purpose of reducing
emissions from diesel engines; and
(e) Any moneys deposited in the fund from any other public or private source.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 468A.803 is amended to read:
468A.803. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall use the moneys in the Clean Diesel
Engine Fund to award:
(a) Grants and loans to the owners and operators of motor vehicles powered by diesel
engines, and equipment  powered by nonroad diesel engines, for up to 25 percent of the cer-
tified costs of qualifying replacements as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799;
[(a)] (b) Grants and loans to the owners and  operators of [ Oregon] diesel engines for up to 100
percent of the certified costs of qualifying retrofits as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799;
[(b)] (c)  Grants and loans to the owners and operators of nonroad [ Oregon] diesel engines for
up to 25 percent of the certified costs of  qualifying repowers as described in ORS 468A.797 and
468A.799; and
[(c)] (d) Grants to the owners of Oregon diesel truck engines to scrap those engines.
[(2) Subject to and consistent with  federal law, any moneys received from the federal government
that are deposited in  the Clean Diesel Engine Fund under ORS 468A.801 (2)(b) must be used for ini-
tiatives to reduce emissions from diesel engines. Subsections (1), (3)  to (5) and (7) of this section and
ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799 do not apply to use of moneys in the Clean  Diesel Engine Fund received
from the federal government. ]
(2) The Environmental  Quality Commission by rule may set grant or loan award rates
at a percentage that is greater than a percentage allowed under subsection (1)  of this sec-
tion, provided that the grant or loan assistance will not  exceed the cost-effectiveness
threshold, if the higher percentage award rate would:
(a) Benefit sensitive populations or areas  with elevated concentrations of diesel
particulate matter; or
(b) Otherwise increase participation by those categories of owners or operators.
(3) In determining the amount of a grant or loan under this section,  the department must reduce
the incremental cost of a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit by the value of any existing
financial incentive that directly reduces the cost of  the qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit,
including tax credits, other grants or loans, or any other public financial assistance.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1008 (SB 1008-B) Page 6
(4) The department may certify third  parties to perform qualifying replacements, repowers and
retrofits and may contract with  third parties to perform such services for the certified costs of
qualifying replacements, repowers and retrofits. The department may also contract with  insti-
tutions of higher education or other public  bodies as defined by ORS 174.109 to train and certify
third parties to perform qualifying replacements, repowers and retrofits.
(5) The department may not award a grant or loan for  a replacement, repower or retrofit
under subsection (1) of this section unless the grant  or loan applicant demonstrates to the
department’s satisfaction that the resulting equivalent motor vehicle, equivalent equipment,
repowered nonroad diesel engine or retrofitted diesel engine will undergo at least 50 percent
of its use in Oregon, as measured by miles driven or  hours operated, for the three years
following the replacement, repower or retrofit.
[(5)] (6)  The department  may not award a grant to scrap an Oregon diesel truck engine under
subsection (1)[ (c)] of this section unless the engine was manufactured prior to 1994 and the  engine
is in operating condition at the time of the grant application or, if repairs are needed,  the owner
demonstrates to the department’s  satisfaction that the engine can be repaired to an operating con-
dition for less than its commercial scrap value. The [ Environmental Quality] commission  shall adopt
rules for a maximum grant awarded under subsection (1)[ (c)] of this section for an engine in  a
heavy-duty truck and for an  engine in a medium-duty truck. A grant awarded under subsection
(1)[(c)] of  this section may not be combined with any other tax credits, grants or loans, or any other
public financial assistance, to scrap an Oregon diesel truck engine.
(7) Subject to and consistent with federal law, any moneys received from the  federal
government that are deposited in the  Clean Diesel Engine Fund under ORS 468A.801 (2)(b)
must be used for initiatives to reduce emissions from diesel engines.  Subsections  (1) to  (6)
of this section and ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799 do not apply to use of moneys in the fund re-
ceived from the federal government.
(8) Any  moneys received by the State of Oregon pursuant to a voluntary written agree-
ment or a settlement approved  in an administrative or judicial proceeding that are deposited
in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund must be used by the  department for activities consistent
with the terms and conditions of the agreement or settlement. Subsections  (1) to (6) of this
section and ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799 do not apply to the use of moneys in the fund received
pursuant to this subsection.
[(6)] (9) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section,  the department  may use the
moneys in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund  to pay expenses of the department in administering the
program described in [ this section ] ORS 468A.795 to 468A.803 .
[(7) The commission shall adopt rules  to implement this section and ORS 468A.801, including but
not limited to establishing preferences for grant and loan awards based upon  percentage of engine use
in Oregon, whether a grant or loan applicant  will provide matching funds, whether scrapping, repow-
ering or  retrofitting an engine will benefit sensitive populations or areas with elevated concentrations
of diesel particulate matter, or such other criteria as the commission may establish. The rules  adopted
by the commission shall reserve a  portion of the financial assistance available each year for applicants
that own or operate a  small number of Oregon diesel engines or Oregon diesel truck engines and shall
provide for simplified access to financial assistance for those applicants. ]
[(8) The department may perform activities necessary to ensure that recipients of grants and loans
from the Clean Diesel Engine Fund comply  with applicable requirements. If the department determines
that a recipient has not complied with applicable requirements, it may  order the recipient to refund all
grant or loan moneys and may impose penalties pursuant to ORS 468.140. ]
SECTION 9.
Sections 10 and 11 of this 2017 Act are added to and made a  part of ORS
468A.795 to 468A.803.
(Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement Moneys; Uses)
Enrolled Senate Bill 1008 (SB 1008-B) Page 7
SECTION 10. (1) Subject to and consistent with ORS 468A.803 (8) and with the terms  of
the Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement, any moneys received by  the State of Oregon
pursuant to the  agreement that are deposited in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund under ORS
468A.801 must be used by the Department of Environmental Quality to award grants  for the
purpose of reducing nitrogen oxides emissions from diesel engines.
(2)(a) To the extent authorized by the agreement, the department shall allocate  moneys
awarded pursuant to subsection  (1) of this section first to award grants to owners and op-
erators of school buses to reduce emissions from at  least 450 school buses powered by diesel
engines operating in this state.
(b) In awarding grants under this subsection, the department shall begin  by awarding
grants to owners and operators of school buses powered by diesel engines that are of  the
median model year of school buses powered by diesel engines  operating in this state, and
shall proceed to award grants for school buses powered by diesel engines  through the ad-
joining model years until the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection are met. A
grant may be awarded under this subsection for any  school bus powered by a diesel engine
within the control of an owner or operator that meets the following conditions:
(A) The school bus has at least three years of remaining useful life;
(B) Use of the school bus has occurred in Oregon during the year preceding  the date of
the grant; and
(C) For the three years following receipt of a grant award,  use of the school bus to which
the owner or operator applies the grant will occur in Oregon.
(c) The grant amount per school bus awarded under this paragraph shall be for:
(A) $50,000 or 30 percent of the cost  to purchase a school bus that meets minimum
standards adopted by the State Board of Education under ORS 820.100 for the applicable class
or type of school bus, whichever is less; or
(B) Up  to 100 percent of the cost to retrofit a school bus with emissions-reducing parts
or technology that results  in a reduction of diesel particulate matter emissions by at least
85 percent when compared with the baseline emissions for the relevant engine  year and ap-
plication.
(3) Except for awarding grants pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the  department
may not award grants from the  moneys described under subsection (1) of this section with-
out prior approval by the Legislative Assembly by law.
(Rules)
SECTION 11.
(1) The Environmental Quality Commission  shall adopt rules necessary to
implement ORS 468A.795 to 468A.803.
(2) Rules adopted under this section must include, but need not be  limited to, rules that
establish preferences for awarding grants and loans under ORS 468A.803 (1) based upon:
(a) A percentage of diesel engine use in Oregon;
(b) Whether a grant or loan applicant will provide matching funds;
(c) Whether scrapping, replacement, repowering  or retrofitting an engine will benefit
sensitive populations or areas with elevated concentrations of diesel particulate matter; or
(d) Other criteria as the commission may establish.
(3) Rules adopted by the commission under this section must reserve a portion  of the
financial assistance available each year for applicants that own or operate a small number
of diesel engines or  Oregon diesel truck engines and must provide for simplified access to
financial assistance for those applicants.
(4) The Department of Environmental Quality may perform activities necessary to ensure
that recipients of  grants and loans from the Clean Diesel Engine Fund comply with applicable
requirements. If the  department determines that a recipient has not complied with applicable
Enrolled Senate Bill 1008 (SB 1008-B) Page 8
requirements, the department may order the recipient to refund all grant or  loan moneys
and may impose penalties pursuant to ORS 468.140.
(School Buses)
SECTION 12.  ORS 468A.796 is amended to read:
468A.796. (1) All school buses  [ with] powered by diesel engines operated in Oregon must , by
January 1, 2025, be:
[(1) Retrofitted with 2007 equivalent engines and 2007  fine particulate matter capture technology
by January 1, 2017; or ]
(a) Repowered with an engine meeting 2007  fine particulate matter federal exhaust
emission standards for diesel heavy-duty engines as set forth in 40 C.F.R. 86.007-11;
(b) Retrofitted:
(A) If retrofitted prior to the effective date of  this 2017 Act, with best available exhaust
control technology; or
(B) If retrofitted on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act,  with exhaust controls
meeting 2007 fine particulate matter federal exhaust emission standards  for diesel heavy-
duty engines as set forth in 40 C.F.R. 86.007-11; or
[(2)] (c)  Replaced with school buses manufactured on or after January 1, 2007[ , by January  1,
2025].
(2) A school bus replaced under [ this subsection ] subsection (1)(c) of this section  may not be
used for transportation of any type.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 327.033 is amended to read:
327.033. (1) As used  in this section, “retrofit” and “Environmental Mitigation Trust
Agreement” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 468A.795.
[(1)] (2) Approved transportation costs shall be estimated for the year of distribution.
[(2)] (3) In determining approved transportation costs, the State Board of Education:
(a) Shall include depreciation of original cost to the school  district of district-owned buses, not
in excess of 10 percent per year; [ and]
(b) Shall include the costs to repower, retrofit[ , as defined in ORS 468A.795, ] or [ to] replace
school buses powered by diesel engines  for the purpose of reducing or eliminating  diesel engine
emissions, except that the board may not include the costs  paid with moneys received from the state
by a school district  from the Clean Diesel Engine Fund under ORS 468A.801 (2)(a) to repower,
retrofit or [ to] replace school buses  powered by diesel engines  for the purpose of reducing or
eliminating diesel engine emissions[ .]; and
(c) Shall include costs to school buses powered by  diesel engines as allowed in the Envi-
ronmental Mitigation Trust Agreement,  except that the board may not include costs paid
from the Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement in the calculation  of the transportation
grant computed as provided in ORS 327.013.
[(3)] (4) School districts shall account separately for  those funds received from the State School
Fund attributable to the costs included under subsection [ (2)] (3)  of this section, and expenditure
of those funds shall be limited as follows:
(a) The expenditure of funds attributable to costs under subsection [ (2)(a)] (3)(a)  of  this section
shall be limited to the acquisition of new buses.
(b) The expenditure of funds attributable to costs under subsection [ (2)(b)] (3)(b) and (c)  of this
section shall be limited to the costs to repower, retrofit[ , as defined in ORS 468A.795, ] or [ to] re-
place school buses powered by diesel engines  for  the purpose of reducing or eliminating diesel
engine emissions.
(5) The  transportation grant computed as provided in ORS 327.013 when combined with
costs paid from the  Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement to replace school buses
powered by diesel engines  may not exceed the purchase price of the buses for which the
funds described in this subsection were received.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1008 (SB 1008-B) Page 9
CAPTIONS
SECTION 14. The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 15. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1008 (SB 1008-B) Page 10